test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-mueqles_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - mueʹles contract stem kevätvesi: # Noun - full paradigm
     mueʹles+N+Sg+Nom: mueʹles
     mueʹles+N+Sg+Gen: muâlˈlaz
     mueʹles+N+Sg+Acc: muâlˈlaz
     mueʹles+N+Sg+Ill: muâlˈlsa
     mueʹles+N+Sg+Loc: muâlˈlsest
     mueʹles+N+Sg+Com: muâlˈlsin
     mueʹles+N+Ess: muâlˈlsen
     mueʹles+N+Par: muâlˈlsed
     mueʹles+N+Sg+Abe: [muâlˈlaztaa, muâlˈlaztää]
     mueʹles+N+Pl+Nom: muâlˈlaz
     mueʹles+N+Pl+Gen: muâlˈlsi
     mueʹles+N+Pl+Acc: muâlˈlsid
     mueʹles+N+Pl+Ill: muâlˈlsid
     mueʹles+N+Pl+Loc: muâlˈlsin
     mueʹles+N+Pl+Com: muâlˈlsivuiʹm
     mueʹles+N+Pl+Abe: [muâlˈlsitaa, muâlˈlsitää]
     
